Maine, session 132, LD2243.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. P&SL 1963, c. 83, §10, first ¶, as amended by P&SL 1995, c. 8, §1, is
further amended to read:
Sec. 10. Authorized to borrow money, to issue bonds and notes. For
accomplishing the purposes of this act, and for such other expenses as may be necessary
for the carrying out of these purposes, the district, through its trustees, without vote of the
inhabitants, is authorized to borrow money temporarily and to issue therefor its negotiable
notes; and for the purpose of renewing and refunding the indebtedness so created, of paying
any necessary expenses and liabilities incurred under the provisions of this act, including
organizational and other necessary expenses and liabilities whether incurred by the district
or the Town of West Paris, the district being authorized to reimburse the Town of West
Paris for any such expense incurred by it and in acquiring properties, paying damages,
laying pipes, mains, aqueducts and conduits, constructing, maintaining and operating a
water plant or system and making renewals, additions, extensions and improvements to the
same and to cover interest payments during the period of construction, the district, through
its trustees, without the vote of its inhabitants, is also authorized to issue, from time to time,
bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the district in one series, or in separate
Page 1 - 132LR3096(02)

series, in such amount or amounts, bearing interest at such rate or rates, and having such
terms and provisions as the trustees determine; provided except that the total outstanding
indebtedness of the district may not exceed $1,000,000 $8,000,000 at any one time.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR3096(02)